Missouri, session 2026, HB2187.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 571, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 571.061, to read as follows:
571.061. No retailer in this state shall complete a sale of ammunition unless the
2 retailer verifies, by means of photographic identification containing the purchaser's
3 date of birth, that the purchaser is of a legal age to purchase the ammunition.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.